Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2704.23
Semen and insemination services; exemption.

Sales and use taxes shall not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of sales and purchases of semen and insemination services for use in ranching or farming or for commercial or industrial uses.

Laws 1992, LB 871, § 42;

Laws 2003, LB 759, § 15.